Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.050

Depositaries to be designated by treasurer—Treasurer's liability and bond additional.

The provisions of RCW 36.48.010 through 36.48.060 shall in no way relieve or release the county treasurer from any liability upon his or her official bond as such treasurer, or any surety upon such bond, and shall in no way affect the duty of the several county treasurers to give bond as required by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4085; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.050. Prior: 1907 c 51 s 5; RRS s 5566.]